Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
CHAPTER 251 Grain Warehouses

251.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Board” means the State Board of Agriculture;

“Claimant” means a person who:

Possesses scale tickets, settlement sheets, ledger cards, or other written evidence of ownership of fund-covered grain stored or possessed by a licensee;

Possesses warehouse receipts relating to fund-covered grain owned, stored, or possessed by a licensee; or

Possesses written evidence of a sale of fund-covered grain to a licensee but did not receive full payment for the grain sold;

“Cooperative agreement” means an agreement made by the board with a state or federal agency for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter;

“Department” means the Kentucky Department of Agriculture;

“Depositor” means any person who deposits grain in a grain warehouse for storage, handling, shipment, or is the owner or legal holder of an outstanding warehouse receipt, or who is lawfully entitled to possession of the grain;

“Facility” means a single location with one (1) or more structures used for the storage or handling of grain;

“Failure” means the occurrence of one (1) or more of the following events:

A licensee’s inability to pay for storage obligations in accordance with requirements set forth in statute, administrative regulation, or contract;

A public declaration of insolvency;

A revocation of a grain dealer license or grain warehouse operator license and an outstanding obligation or indebtedness by the licensee;

A failure to pay a producer in the ordinary course of business and a bona fide dispute does not exist between the licensee and the producer;

A failure to deliver a grain to a depositor in the ordinary course of business and a bona fide dispute does not exist between the licensee and the depositor;

A failure to make timely application for license renewal; or

A denial of license renewal application;

“Forward pricing contract” means an agreement for sale which provides that:

Title passes at the time of delivery; and

The price will be determined at a later date;

“Fund” means the Kentucky grain insurance fund established by KRS

251.640

;

“Fund-covered grain” means grain as used in KRS

251.385

;

“Grain” means corn, wheat, soybeans, rye, barley, oats, grain sorghums, or popcorn;

“Grain dealer” means any person engaged in the business of buying grain from producers for resale, milling, or processing. A producer of grain buying grain for the producer’s own use as seed or feed shall not be considered to be engaging in the business of buying grain for resale, milling, or processing;

“Grain warehouse operator” means a person who owns, controls, operates, or manages any public grain warehouse in which grain is stored for compensation;

“Gross value” means the value of grain after deductions for quality discounts, including but not limited to discounts for excessive moisture or foreign matter, but before deductions for storage or marketing charges;

“Person” means any individual, partnership, firm, corporation, limited liability company, or other corporate entity created under the laws of the Commonwealth or any other jurisdiction;

“Producer” means the owner, tenant, or operator of land who has an economic or financial interest in grain or receives all or any part of the proceeds from the sale of grain;

“Seed” means grain that is set aside to be used for the purpose of producing new plants;

“Warehouse” means any building, structure, or other protected enclosure, permanent or temporary, used or useable for the storage or conditioning of grain. Buildings used in connection with or operation of the grain warehouse shall be deemed part of the warehouse; and

“Warehouse receipt” means a document of title issued by a person engaged in the business of storing grains for compensation.

History.

30c-2; repealed and reenacted by 2019 ch. 88, § 3, effective August 1, 2019.

251.015.
Division of Regulation and Inspection. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 393, § 8, effective July 13, 1990; 2002, ch. 49, § 6, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 88, § 7, effective July 13, 2004; repealed by 2019 ch. 88, § 27, effective August 1, 2019.

251.020.
Powers and functions of state board — Administrative regulations — Cooperative agreements with state and federal agencies, universities, and other entities — Application to Circuit Court for orders to enjoin — Power to bring or defend civil actions — Discipline of current or former licensees.

The board shall have the following powers, and all powers incidental or necessary to same, in carrying out the duties set forth in KRS

251.340

, in addition to the powers enumerated elsewhere within this chapter and in other chapters to:

Promulgate administrative regulations, in conjunction with the department, necessary for the proper administration and enforcement of the provisions of this chapter, and for the accomplishment of the purposes intended by this chapter;

Enter into cooperative agreements with state agencies, federal agencies, universities, and other entities;

Make application to the Franklin Circuit Court, or a Circuit Court in the county where the licensed grain facility is located, for an order enjoining actions on the part of any person that would constitute a violation of any section of this chapter or any administrative regulation promulgated under the authority of this chapter;

Bring or defend civil actions that relate to the provisions of this chapter, the department’s actions, or the board’s actions under the authority of this chapter. Legal expenses incurred shall be approved for payment by the board; and

Take disciplinary action against any current or former licensee.

History.

30c-3; 2019 ch. 88, § 18, effective August 1, 2019.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Administrative regulations, adoption date and effective date, KRS

13A.330

.

State Board of Agriculture, KRS

246.120

to

246.180

.

251.030.
Compensation of state board. [Repealed.]

251.040.
Local boards — Purpose. [Repealed.]

251.050.
Local boards — Appointment — Qualifications. [Repealed.]

251.060.
Term of members — Filling of vacancies. [Repealed.]

251.070.
Compensation of local board. [Repealed.]

251.080.
Officers of local board. [Repealed.]

251.090.
Bond of secretary-treasurer. [Repealed.]

251.100.
License, name and number of local board. [Repealed.]

251.110.
Refund to owners by local board. [Repealed.]

251.120.
Sealers — Appointment and powers. [Repealed.]

251.130.
Bond and oath of sealer. [Repealed.]

251.140.
Compensation of sealer. [Repealed.]

251.150.
Functions of sealer. [Repealed.]

251.160.
Application for storage — Consent to inspection. [Repealed.]

251.170.
Sealing fees — Payment of expenses. [Repealed.]

251.180.
Fastenings — Tampering with prohibited. [Repealed.]

251.190.
Sealer to deliver receipts — Receipts subject to Uniform Commercial Code. [Repealed.]

251.200.
Form of warehouse receipts. [Repealed.]

251.210.
Sealer to issue certificates of reinspection — Ascertain outstanding receipts and make periodic inspections. [Repealed.]

251.220.
Issuance of fraudulent receipt prohibited. [Repealed.]

251.230.
Sealer to file duplicate receipts with board. [Repealed.]

251.240.
Issuance of duplicate warehouse receipt. [Repealed.]

251.250.
Duplicate to be recorded before negotiation. [Repealed.]

251.260.
County clerk to index duplicate — Recording is notice. [Repealed.]

251.270.
Assignment of recorded receipt — Clerk’s fee. [Repealed.]

251.280.
Cancellation of warehouse receipt. [Repealed.]

251.290.
Delivery of grain when receipt outstanding prohibited. [Repealed.]

251.300.
Owner not to sell or encumber grain, after receipt issued. [Repealed.]

251.310.
Appeal to state board — Hearing. [Repealed.]

251.320.
Orders of state board — Suspension of license of local board. [Repealed.]

251.330.
Costs of hearing. [Repealed.]